apertium-evn.evn-relaxed.twol
"ъ appears after Cons"
%{ъ%}:ъ <=> :Cons :0* %>: _ ;
         except
                    н %>: _ ;
         %>: %{i%}: л %>: _ ;
                %>: р %>: _ ;

!# уму{а}к>{ъ}{Я}
!# уму0к0ъя
!@ у м у {а}:0 к >:0 {ъ}:ъ {Я}:я

!# дэт>{ъ}{Я}	
!# дэт0ъе
!@ д э т >:0 {ъ}:ъ {Я}:е

!"Assimilation of %{Б%}"
!%{Б%}:б <=                                          _ [ %{A%}: | %{Э%}: ] [ р | л ];
!         except
!           [ :VoicelessCns | %{☭%}: ] :0* _ [ %{A%}: | %{Э%}: ] [ р | л ];
